Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 1

Narcotic Drugs [Repealed]

53-11-101 — 53-11-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 53-11-101 — 53-11-110 (Acts 1937, ch. 255, §§ 4-7, 9, 11, 13, 15-17; 1939, ch. 165, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 6632.5-6632.8, 6632.10, 6632.12, 6632.14, 6632.16-6632.18 (Williams, §§ 6618.4-6618.7, 6618.9, 6618.11, 6618.13, 6618.15-6618.17); Acts 1955, ch. 43, § 1; 1955, ch. 90, §§ 2, 3; 1963, ch. 369, §§ 3, 4; 1970, ch. 404, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 52-1305 — 52-1308, 52-1310, 52-1312, 52-1314, 52-1316 — 52-1318), concerning narcotic drugs, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 485, § 2.